California, session 20252026, AB941.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 2845) is added to Part 2 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 8.5. Electrical Infrastructure Projects Article 1. Definitions2845. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicant” means the entity proposing an electrical infrastructure project.(b) “California Environmental Quality Act” or “CEQA” means Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code and guidelines adopted pursuant to that division.(c) “Electrical infrastructure project” or “project” means a project for the construction and operation of an electrical transmission line or power line, as defined by the commission’s General Order 131-E, and associated infrastructure, including substations and ancillary facilities, that requires discretionary approval by the commission pursuant to Section 1001 or the commission’s General Order 131-E or its successor.(d) “Priority project” means any electrical infrastructure project that is one or more of the following:(1) Approved by the Independent System Operator in a transmission plan.(2) For the purpose of interconnection of renewable generation resources to the electrical grid.(3) A system upgrade project included in a Independent System Operator cluster study.(4) Substation projects identified as necessary to support anticipated load growth as a result of the electrification of the state’s energy supply. Article 2. General Provisions2845.10. (a) For a priority project, no later than 270 days after the commission determines in a preliminary ruling setting the scope and schedule that an application for an electrical infrastructure project is complete, the commission shall determine whether to certify the environmental impact report, adopt a negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or an addendum, or determine that the project is exempt from CEQA, and make a final determination regarding the project.(b) The time period specified in subdivision (a) may be extended if any of the following occurs:(1) The commission is required to recirculate the environmental impact report pursuant to Section 15088.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(2) Substantial changes are proposed in the project that may involve new significant environmental effects or a substantial increase in the severity of previously identified significant effects.(3) Substantial changes occur with respect to the circumstances under which the project is undertaken that may involve new significant environmental effects or a substantial increase in the severity of previously identified significant effects.(4) New information of substantial importance, that was not known and could not have been known with the exercise of reasonable diligence before the commission publishes the notice of availability, is submitted that may require additional analysis and consideration.(5) The commission, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife or the State Water Resources Control Board, if applicable, determines that additional time is necessary to obtain information and conduct surveys, including, but not limited to, due to seasonal constraints.(c) An applicant shall identify an electrical infrastructure project that is a priority project and the basis for the designation in the application to the commission.2845.11. For a priority project, all of the following shall apply:(a) No later than 30 days after the filing of an application, the commission staff shall review it and notify the applicant in writing of any deficiencies in the information and data submitted in the application.(b) The applicant shall, within 60 days of notification pursuant to subdivision (a), correct any deficiencies or explain in writing to the commission staff why it is unable to do so and include an estimate of when it will be able to correct the deficiencies.(c) As required by Section 65943 of the Government Code, the commission shall deem the application complete with a preliminary ruling setting the scope and schedule as follows:(1) No later than 30 days after submission of the application, except when the applicant is notified of deficiencies pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) If the applicant is notified of deficiencies pursuant to subdivision (a), no later than 30 days after the applicant submits information in response to the notification, except when the applicant is notified during those 30 days that previously identified deficiencies remain.(3) Immediately upon the commission’s determination that all additional information requested by the commission staff has been provided.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.